Idaho, session 2026, H0832.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-2205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2205. STATE BOARD TO APPOINT ADMINISTRATOR -- DESIGNATION OF AS-
SISTANTS -- DIVISION OF CAREER TECHNICAL EDUCATION -- DUTIES AND POWERS. (1)
The state board of education shall appoint a person to serve as an adminis-
trator to the state board for career technical education, who shall be known
as the administrator of career technical education. The administrator shall
designate, by and with the advice and consent of the state board for career
technical education, such assistants as may be necessary to properly carry
out the provisions of the federal acts and this chapter for the state of
Idaho. The administrator and such assistants shall together be known as the
division of career technical education.
(2) The administrator of career technical education shall also carry
into effect such rules as the state board for career technical education may
adopt, shall coordinate all efforts in career technical education approved
by the board with the executive secretary, and shall prepare such reports
concerning the condition of career technical education in the state as the
state board for career technical education may require.
(3) The division of career technical education may coordinate with
the Idaho digital learning academy to develop any statewide virtual career
technical education course delivery. Districts may choose to enroll in the
course offered by the Idaho digital learning academy or may use their own
curriculum providers.
(4) The division of career technical education shall maintain a list of
secondary career technical education pathways that can be delivered by tra-
ditional means or entirely online, or a combination of both methods. The
division of career technical education shall develop a methodology for the
funding of each pathway delivery type. For those pathways that are able to
be delivered entirely online, there shall be a presumption that they shall
receive the same funding as for traditional career technical education path-
ways; however, actual funding shall be based upon actual approved costs, not
to exceed the cost of delivering these pathways in a traditional setting.
(5) The division of career technical education may provide incentives
to Idaho public colleges and universities offering career technical pro-
grams that, in coordination with the division, align their foundational
courses that are required in the same or substantially similar programs of
study so as to achieve uniformity and transferability in the core program


requirements at all such public colleges and universities. Postsecondary
credits earned by a student in a career technical education program shall
transfer at the full credit value to any public Idaho college or university
in a like program of study and such postsecondary credits will be treated by
any such public college or university as satisfying specific course require-
ments in such program of study.
(6) The board shall authorize the issuance of career technical educa-
tion certificates to individuals who seek to teach in career-related sub-
jects and who:
(a) Submit to a criminal history check as described in section 33-130,
Idaho Code, and meet at least one (1) of the following criteria:
(i) Hold or have held an approved industry certification in a
field closely related to the content area in which the individual
seeks to teach as defined by the division of career technical edu-
cation;
(ii) Demonstrate a minimum of six thousand (6,000) hours of
adequate professional experience in a field closely related to the
content area in which the individual seeks to teach, as determined
by the state board for career technical education; or
(iii) Hold a baccalaureate degree in a field closely related to
the content area in which the individual seeks to teach and demon-
strate two thousand (2,000) hours of adequate professional expe-
rience in a field closely related to the content area in which the
individual seeks to teach, as determined by the state board for ca-
reer technical education; and
(b) Complete an educator training program or courses approved by the
division of career technical education.
(7) The state board of education may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.